Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 6 Accounts and Control
35-6-43.
Liberal construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally interpreted and construed, in order to accomplish the purposes hereof as declared herein, and in order to accomplish the purposes of relevant provisions of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 56; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-43

.

35-6-44.
Severability.

Each section of this chapter and every part of each section are hereby declared to be independent sections, and the holding of any section or sections or parts thereof to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 14; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 138; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 57; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-44

.